West Virginia, session 2026, SB409.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2L. High School Educator FlexIbility Act of 2026. §18-2L-1. Short title. (a) This article may be cited as "The High School Educator Flexibility Act."§18-2L-2. Definitions. For the purposes of this article:"Approved professional learning" means a professional learning experience facilitated by an approved provider that satisfies all the following conditions:(1) The professional learning consists of no fewer than 30 clock hours of course-specific content and pedagogy instruction offered in one training or in sequenced modules completed within a single year;(2) Professional learning sessions are anchored to the provider’s course framework; (3) Professional learning sessions are facilitated by an individual the provider has formally vetted and then endorsed after completing the provider’s own faculty-development program and maintaining currency with the latest framework version; and(4) At the conclusion of professional learning, participants receive a dated certificate verifying the course title, hours earned, and the approved provider’s name; districts shall accept that certificate as proof of compliance."Approved provider" means a U.S.-based, non-profit educational organization that publishes the curriculum framework for each high-quality course and requires each school offering the course to secure course authorization."High-quality course" means a high school course that satisfies all the following criteria:(1) The course is designed and maintained in partnership with accredited postsecondary institutions or industry representatives;(2) The course leads to articulated post-secondary credit or an employer-endorsed credential; and(3) The course includes an externally validated, nationally administered end-of-course exam.§18-2L-3 Establishment of course-specific teaching permit. (a) The Board of Education or West Virginia Commission for Professional Teaching Standards shall establish a course-specific teaching permit for certified educators who hold valid professional educator certificates but do not possess endorsements for specific subject areas.(b) The course-specific permit shall authorize eligible educators to teach high-quality courses outside their formally endorsed certification area. These high-quality courses can be in academic and/or career and technical education areas.(c) The permanent course permit shall be issued upon completion of approved professional learning directly linked to the specific high-quality course content.(d) The course-specific permit shall enable immediate classroom instruction upon successful completion of the approved professional learning.§18-2L-4. Eligibility criteria. Educators eligible for the course-specific permit shall:(1) Possess a current, valid professional educator certificate issued by the Board of Education or West Virginia Commission for Professional Teaching Standards; and (2) Successfully complete approved professional learning from an approved provider aligned to high-quality course-specific content.§18-2L-5. Role of local education agencies.  Local education agencies shall have the authority and flexibility to assign teachers holding course-specific permits to classrooms requiring such specialized instructional capacity.§18-2L-6. List of qualifying courses and training. The Board of Education shall maintain, and update on an annual basis, a list of: (1) Approved high-quality courses eligible for staffing through course-specific permits;(2) Approved providers who facilitate approved professional learning experiences; and(3) Approved professional learning experiences.§18-2L-7. Career-technical education funding guarantee. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an instructor who holds a valid course-specific permit shall be deemed an "appropriately licensed or certified career-technical instructor" for purposes of:(1) Program approval and renewal under §18A-3-1 of this code, and(2) The calculation and distribution of career-technical education weighted funding under §18-9A-1 et seq. of this code.(b) The Board of Education or Office of Certification shall:(1) Publish licensure-guideline language recognizing the course-specific permit as proper certification for the corresponding career-technical education program area; and(2) Implement an automated data-system override that clears any licensure error codes generated solely because the instructor holds a course-specific permit rather than a standard career-technical education license.(c) Districts and career-technical planning districts shall not experience any reduction, withholding, or restricting of career-technical education weighted funding for a course taught by a properly permitted instructor.